Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.675

Child care workers—Career and wage ladder.

(1) Subject to the availability of funds appropriated for this specific purpose, the department shall establish a child care career and wage ladder in licensed child care centers that meet the following criteria: (a) At least ten percent of child care slots are dedicated to children whose care is subsidized by the state or any political subdivision thereof or any local government; (b) the center agrees to adopt the child care career and wage ladder, which, at a minimum, shall be at the same pay schedule as existed in the previous child care career and wage ladder pilot project; and (c) the center meets further program standards as established by rule pursuant to *section 4, chapter 507, Laws of 2005.

The child care career and wage ladder shall include wage increments for levels of education, years of relevant experience, levels of work responsibility, relevant early childhood education credits, and relevant requirements in the state training and registry system.

(2) The department shall establish procedures for the allocation of funds to implement the child care career and wage ladder among child care centers meeting the criteria identified in subsection (1) of this section. In developing these procedures, the department shall:

(a) Review past efforts or administration of the child care career and wage ladder pilot project in order to take advantage of any findings, recommendations, or administrative practices that contributed to that pilot project's success;

(b) Consult with stakeholders, including organizations representing child care teachers and providers, in developing an allocation formula that incorporates consideration of geographic and demographic distribution of child care centers adopting the child care career and wage ladder; and

(c) Develop a system for prioritizing child care centers interested in adopting the child care career and wage ladder that is based on the criteria identified in subsection (1) of this section.

(3) Notwithstanding the requirements of subsection (2) of this section, child care centers meeting the criteria in subsection (1) of this section located in urban areas of the department of social and health services region one shall receive a minimum of fifteen percent of the funds allocated through the child care career and wage ladder, and of these centers, child care centers meeting the criteria in subsection (1) of this section participating in the Spokane tiered reimbursement pilot project shall have first priority for child care career and wage ladder funding.

[ 2006 c 265 s 205; 2005 c 507 s 2. Formerly RCW 43.215.505, 74.13.098.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: Section 4 of this act was vetoed.